District of Columbia statutes.
29-302.03

Incorporation.

(a)

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence shall begin when the articles of incorporation are filed.

(b)

The Mayor’s filing of the articles of incorporation shall be conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation, except in a proceeding by the District to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720